North Carolina, session 2025, SB236.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Edgecombe Community College for the
construction of the Industrial Technology and Skilled Trades Facility, which will aid the College
in strengthening the area's workforce.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S236-v-1*